Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2334.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1307(g) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1307. Period of registration.* * *(g) Election.--Upon application on a form prescribed by the department, the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle, except a motor vehicle registered under the International Registration Plan and a motor vehicle with a seasonal registration or a circus or carnival plate, may elect to pay an annual registration fee for a two-year period. The fee shall be two times the amount of the registration fee otherwise payable for the motor vehicle under this title minus at least 10% of the 1234567891011121314151617 total registration fee excluding the fee for local use required by s ection 1935 ( relating to fee for local use) as determined by the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2334PN3108 - 2 - 1234